fi: Käyttömekanismin sijainti: Keskiveto; Etuveto; Takaveto; Muu
sk-SK: Umiestnenie pohonu: Stredný pohon; Predný pohon; Zadný pohon; Iné
vi: Vị trí truyền động: Dẫn động trung tâm; Dẫn động cầu trước; Dẫn động cầu sau; Khác
zh-TW: 驅動位置: 中置馬達驅動; 前輪驅動; 後輪驅動; 其他
th: ขับรถโซล: ขับกลาง; ขับหน้า; ขับหลัง; อื่นๆ
ko: 드라이브 위치: 센터 드라이브; 프런트 드라이브; 리어 드라이브; 기타
ro-RO: Amplasarea mecanismului de acționare: Transmisie centrală; Transmisie față; Transmisie spate; Altele
pl: Lokalizacja napędu: Napęd centralny; Napęd przedni; Napęd tylny; Inne
cs: Umístění pohonu: Středový pohon; Přední pohon; Zadní pohon; Jiné
it: Drive sede: Trazione centrale; Trazione anteriore; Trazione posteriore; Altro
hr-HR: Lokacija pogona: Središnji pogon; Prednji pogon; Stražnji pogon; Ostalo
fr: Emplacement de l’entraînement: Entraînement central; Entraînement avant; Entraînement arrière; Autre
de: Position des Antriebs: Mittelantrieb; Frontantrieb; Heckantrieb; Sonstige
ru: Расположение привода: Центральный привод; Передний привод; Задний привод; Другое
tr: Sürüş konumu: Orta tahrik; Ön tahrik; Arka tahrik; Diğer
es: Ubicación de la transmisión: Transmisión central; Transmisión delantera; Transmisión trasera; Otro
pt-BR: Local de acionamento: Acionamento central; Acionamento dianteiro; Acionamento traseiro; Outros
lt-LT: Pavaros vieta: Centrinė pavara; Priekinė pavara; Galinė pavara; Kita
ja: ドライブロケーション: センタードライブ; フロントドライブ; リアドライブ; その他
el: Τοποθέτηση συστήματος μετάδοσης κίνησης: Κεντρική κίνηση; Μπροστινή κίνηση; Πίσω κίνηση; Άλλο
hu: Meghajtó elhelyezkedése: Középső hajtás; Első hajtás; Hátsó hajtás; Egyéb
zh-CN: 驱动机构位置: 中置驱动; 前置驱动; 后置驱动; 其他
sv: Drivposition: Mittmonterad drift; Framhjulsdrift; Bakhjulsdrift; Övrigt
sl-SI: Lokacija pogona: Sredinski pogon; Sprednji pogon; Zadnji pogon; Drugo
nb: Drive-lokalisering: Midtmontert drift; Forhjulsdrift; Bakhjulsdrift; Annet
nl: Aandrijving locatie: Middenaandrijving; Voorwielaandrijving; Achterwielaandrijving; Overige
bg-BG: Местоположение на ремъка: Централно задвижване; Предно задвижване; Задно задвижване; Друго
pt-PT: Localização do acionamento: Transmissão central; Transmissão dianteira; Transmissão traseira; Outro
en: Drive location: Center drive; Front drive; Rear drive; Other
da: Drivremmens placering: Centerdrev; Frontdrev; Bagdrev; Andet